dictsource/ca_rules
// translation rules for Catalan
// This file is UTF8 encoded

// OPTIONS (accents)
// This version of espeak takes into account 4 varieties of catalan:
//      ?1 general eastern. central specific characteristics 
//      ?2 general western. north-western specific characteristics 
//      ?3 valencian specific characteristics (valencian is 2+3. 3 overwrites 2)
//      ?4 balearic specific characteristics (balearic is 1+4. 4 overwrites 1)
//      ?5 algherese specific characteristics (algherese is 2+3+5. , but 5 overwrites the others) It inherits from Valencian because they have the same E/e, b/v and Z/S systems.
//      ?6 rossellonese (septentrional) specific characteristics (rossellonese is 1+6)

// We have tried to make the rules and lists of transcriptions as general as posible, 
// and to deal with the particularities of each accent (for instance, unestressed vowels and [v] in Central accent) 
// in the definition of the phonemes (ph_catalan* files), when it has been feasible to do so.

// ALTERNATIVE RULES
// $alt1: e is an e and o is an o
// $alt2: e is an E and o is an O
// $alt3: avoid BL and GL gemination
// $alt4: final -ig is [ik] or last consonant (r, t) is not silent
// $alt5: not secondary stress. words with stressed @ in Balearic
// $alt6: h is pronunced [X]

// LETTER GROUPS
//      A  any vowel
//      C  any consonant
//      K  not a vowel (i.e. consonant or word boundary)
//      X  There is no vowel until the word boundary.

.L01 i í e é è          // front vowels
.L02 a o à ò ó u        // center and back vowels
.L03 a e o              // strong vowels
.L04 i u                // weak vowels
.L05 à è é í ò ó ú      // stressed vowels

.L10 p t k f s          // unvoiced
.L11 b d g m v l n r z j// voiced
.L12 b d g m v n z j    // voiced, not r or l
.L13 p t k b d g q      // plosives
.L14 s z x j ge gi ce ci// fricatives


.L15 c ç                // ces
.L16 q g                // letters that can be followed by an u

.L20 c q g              // velars
.L21 p b v m            // bilabials

.L25 ce sa vi           // not silent +nt

.group a
        a          a
        ae         aE2  // do not reduce
        ahe        aE2  // do not reduce
        
    un) a (_hora        // elision 
 _quin) a (_hora        // elision 
  _bon) a (_hora        // elision 
 _mitj) a (_hora        // elision 
   _ar) a (_A           // elision

    // prefixes with secondary stress
    _)  a (nte@@   ,a   // (antepenúltim)
    _)  a (nti@@   ,a   // (antepenúltim)
    _)  ae  (ro@@  ,ae2
   _f)  a (rmaco   ,a   // (farmacognòsia)
  _gu)  a (rda     ,a   // (guardabosc)
   _v)  a (so@     ,a   // (vasoconstrictor)
   _m)  a (cro@     ,a  // (macro-)
    
    // words that it is not a prefix
   _m)  a (lalt    a    // (malalt)
   _m)  a (lefi    a    // (malefici)
   _m)  a (lic     a    // (maliciós)
   _m)  a (ll      a    // (mallorquí)
   _m)  a (l·l     a    // (mal·leable)
    _)  a (utoritz a    // (autorització)
    _)  a (nte@@$w_alt5 a   // (anterior)
    _)  a (nti@@$w_alt5 a   // (antilop)
    _)  a (uto@@$w_alt5 a   // (autodestrucció)
  _gu)  a (rda$w_alt5   a   // (guardabosc)
   _m)  a (l@$w_alt5    a   // (malpensar)
   
.group b
        b          b    
  _bi)  bl (io     Bl   // avoid gemination 
  _su)  bl (im     Bl   // avoid gemination 
        bm         mm   // assimilation 
?3      bm         bm   // assimilation 
    A)  bl (A      bbl  // gemination (poble)
    A)  bl (A$w_alt3+    Bl // avoid gemination 
    o)  bl (id     Bl   // avoid gemination (oblidar) 
?2  A)  bl (A      Bl   // avoid gemination in western accents (poble)
  _su)  b  (A      p    // prefix "sub-"
  _su)  b  (urbi   b    // not prefix "sub-"
?3 _su) b  (sC          // (subscriure)
?4 _su) b  (sC          // (subscriure)
?3  _o) b  (sC         
?4  _o) b  (sC         
?4   A) brs (_A     dds // (obrs una porta)
?5   A) bs         s  // (obstrucció)
  
 
.group c
        c          k    // (casa)
        c (L01     s    // (cirera)
        ch         tS   // (chihuahua)
        ch (_      k    // (lluch, llach, folch, etc.)
        ck         k    // foreign words
           
?4 Aix_) c (L01    ts   // dissimilation (peix celíac)
?4   s_) c (L01    ts   // (dos celíacs)
?4   ç_) c (L01    ts   // (dolç celest)
?4 Aig_) c (L01    ts
?4 Atx_) c (L01    ts

?5       cc (L01   s    // (obstrucció)
?5       c (s_     t    // (obstrucció)

.group ç
        ç (_       =s    // (llaç)
  L05J) ç         s      
        ç         s
        
        ç (_A     z     // (llaç estret)
        ç (_hA    z     // (llaç hebreu)
        ç (_L11   z     // (llaç bonic
        
?4   A) ç (_s     t     // pronounce -s as -t if followed by an s (llaç sedós)
?4   A) ç (_z     d     // pronounce -s as -d if followed by an z (llaç zenital)
?4   A) ç (_cL01  t     // pronounce -s as -t  if followed by -ce/ci 
?4   A) ç (-cL01  t     // pronounce -s as -t  if followed by -ce/ci
?4   A) ç (_x     t     // dissimilation (llaç xarop)
?4   A) ç (_j     d     // dissimilation (llaç joc)
?4   A) ç (_gL01  d     // dissimilation (llaç gerro)

?5      ç         ts

.group d
        d          d    
     _) d' (P2     d    // apostrophe
   _su) d (-       t
  _nor) d (-       t
?3  _a) d (sC           // (adscriure)
?4  _a) d (sC
?5   A) d (A       **   // (roda)   
?5      dr         R
?5   _) d (orm     R
?6   n) dr         R

.group e
        e          e
        e ($w_alt1++ e  // wordlist
        e ($w_alt2++ E  // wordlist
?4      e ($w_alt5++ @  // wordlist: balearic stressed @
    -t) e (_       e%
?1  qu) e (_e           // elision (que ell...)
?1  qu) e (_a           // elision (que ara...)
    
    // initial e pronounced a - western accents
?2   _) e (n@       a   // (entendre)
?2   _) e (m@       a   // (embolicar)
?2   _) e (s@       a   // (estendre)
?2   _) e (ix@      a   // (eixir)
    
    // contextual e rules
        e (nt_     e
        e (rL21    e    // (herba, serp, terme. but ferm, erm)
        e (r_      e    // (Roger)
        e (rs_     e    // (Rogers)
        e (ro_     e    // (torero)
        e (ra_     e    // (cremallera)
        e (res_    e    // (cremalleres)
        e (ll      e    // (canell)
        e (st      e    
        e (mt      e     
        e (nt      e    // (menta)
        e (nd      e     
        e (ix      e     
        e (mbr     e
        e (ssi     e    // subjuntius
     v) e (sp      e    // (vespre)
     v) e (tll     e    // (vetlla)
    tr) e (t       e    // (trets)
     l) e (ma_     e     
     l) e (mes_    e     
    cr) e (t       e     
    cr) e (p       e     
     c) e (rcl     e     
    pr) e (g       e    // (prego)
   _pr) e (A       e2   // (preescriptura)
    _r) e (L03     e2   // (reescriptura)
     n) e (g       e    // (nego)
    _s) e (g       e    // (sego)
  sist) e (m       e    // (sistema)
    al) e (gr      e    // (alegre)
   _ll) e          e     
     f) e (t       e
    gr) e (u       e
   arr) e (r       e
    _b) e (llug    e
    _r) e (g       e    // (regne, regno, etc.)
     _) e (ntrevis e    // entrevista
     _) e (ntren   e    // entrenar
    _r) e (tron    e    // (retronar)
    _r) e (troc    e    // (retrocedir)
    _r) e (trob    e    // (retrobar)
    _r) eu (bi     e2u  // (reubicar)
    _r) eu (nifi   e2u  // (reunificar)
    _r) eu (rbanitz  e2u    // (reurbanitzar)
    _r) eu (tilitz   e2u    // (reutilitzar)
    _r) ee (ixi    e    // (reeixir)
    _r) ei (mpr    e2i  // (reimpressió)
    _r) ei (nc     e2i  // (reincidència, reincorporació)
    _r) ei (naugur e2i  // (reinaugur)
    _r) ei (ngr    e2i  // (reingressar)
    _r) ei (ntent  e2i  // (reintentar)
    _r) ei (inter  e2i  // (reinterpretar)
        
    // contextual E rules
        e (l       E    // (elm)
        e (x       E    
        e (r       E    // (merla, ferro. but però Berga i Matadepera)
        e  (j      E
    c)  e  (b      E
   con) e (ix      E 
     n) e (rv      E 
     v) e (rb      E
     v) e (rs      E
  conv) e (x       E
     d) e (rm      E
    sp) e (rm      E
    
    // accent variants
?1      e (ct      e    // (subjecte)
?1   t) e (xt      e    // (text)
?1      e (ma_     E    // (problema) 
?1      e (mes_    E    
?1   t) e (ca_     E    // (biblioteca)
?1   t) e (ques_   E    
?1      e (u       E    // (creu, veu, deu)
?1      e (g       E    
?1   @) e (ix      E     
?1      e (t       E    // (barrufet)
?1      e (c       E    
?1      e (i       E    
?1      e (s       E    
?1      e (m       E    
?1      e (na_     E    
?1      e (nes_    E    
?1      e (n       E    
?1      e (d_      E    
?1      e (ds_     E    
?1      e (da_     E    
?1      e (des_    E    

?2 fon) e (m       e    // (fonema)
?2      e (cte_    E    // (perfecte)
?2      e (cta_    E    // (perfecta)
?2      e (ctes_   E    // (perfectes)
?2      e (ixu     a    // (eixugar. according with https://giec.iec.cat/textgramatica/codi/3.3.4.1 -e)

?3   @) eix (_     iS   // terminació verbs incoatius (afegeix)
?3   @) eix (@     iS   // terminació verbs incoatius (afegeix)
?3  @t) eix (_     ejS   // terminació verbs incoatius (afegeix)

?4   @) e (ix_+    @    
?4   C) e (ix      e     
?4      e (t_++    @    // (barrufet)
?4      e (ta_++   @    
?4      e (ts_++   @    
?4      e (tes_++  @    
?4      e (nc_     @    
?4      e (nca_    @    
?4      e (ncs_    @
?4      e (nques_  @ 
?4      e (ny_     @  
?4      e (nys_    @ 
?4      e (sc_     @ 
?4      e (sca_    @
?4      e (scs_    @
?4      e (scos_   @
?4      e (sques_  @
?4      e (sa_     @
?4      e (sos_    @
?4      e (ses_    @
?4      e (i_      @
?4      e (ia_     @
?4      e (is_     @
?4      e (ies_    @
?4      e (ina_    @
?4      e (ines_   @
?4      e (na_     @
?4      e (ns_     @
?4      e (nes_    @
?4      e (c_+     E    // (espetec)
?4      e (g_+     E
?4      e (i+      @
?4      e (s+      @
?4      e (m@+     @
?4      e (d_+     @
?4      e (ds_+    @
?4      e (da_+    @
?4      e (des_+   @
?4      e (ga_+    @
?4      e (gues_+  @

?5      eix (A+     eS   // rule to control e elision when unestressed #20 nov - editat per eliminar j
?5      eix (en_+   eS   // rule to control e elision when unestressed
?5      e (t       E    // (barrufet)
?5  _d) e (cid     i
?5  ll) eu (ger    u
?5   _) e          e2
?5   _) e (n       e
?5      e (t       e    // (barrufet)

?5  _t) e (le      e2

?6      eiem (_    i'em
?6      eieu (_    i'eu
?6 Abl) e    (_    e2  // (possible)
?6 Abl) e    (s_   e2  // (possible)

    // prefixes with secondary stress
     _) e (ntreA   ,e   // (entreacte)
     _) e (ntreC   ,e   // (entresòl)
    _a) e (ro      ,e
    _b) e (ll      ,e    
  _jud) e (o       ,e
    _c) e (ntre@   ,e
     _) e (ntre@   ,e
    _h) e (tero    ,e
    _n) e (o@      ,e
  _pal) e (o       ,e
    _r) e (ra      ,e
   _el) e (ctro@   ,E
  _est) e (reo     ,E   // estereotipat
     _) e (xtra    ,E
 _magn) e (to      ,E
    _m) e (dico    ,E
    _m) e (nys     ,E
    _n) euro (@     ,Ew**o2
   _ps) e (udo     ,E
    _r) e (tro     ,E
    _s) e (mi@     ,E   // (semiconductor)
    _s) e (rvo@    ,E   // (semiconductor)
    _t) e (rmo@    ,E   // (termogènesi)

    // accent variants for prefixes with secondary stress
?2  _m) e (nys     ,e
?2  _n) e (uro     ,e
?2  _r) e (tro     ,e
?2  _t) e (rmo@    ,e   // (termogènesi)
?2 _el) e (ctro@   ,e
?4  _m) e (nys++   ,@
